Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3826.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.841, is amended to read: 626.841 BOARD; MEMBERS. new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Members. new text end new text begin (a) new text end The Board of Peace Officer Standards and Training deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be composed of the following 17 members: (1) deleted text begin two members to be appointed by the governor from among the county sheriffs in Minnesotadeleted text end new text begin two peace officers representing county sheriffs, one from the metropolitan area as defined in section 473.121, subdivision 2, and one from outside the metropolitan area, appointed by the governor after considering the slate of candidates submitted by the Minnesota Sheriffs' Association pursuant to paragraph (b)new text end ; (2) deleted text begin four members to be appointed by the governor from among peace officers in Minnesota municipalities, at least two of whom shall be chiefs of policedeleted text end new text begin two municipal police chiefs, one from the metropolitan area as defined in section 473.121, subdivision 2, and one from outside the metropolitan area, appointed by the governor after considering the slate of candidates submitted by the Minnesota Chiefs of Police Association pursuant to paragraph (b)new text end ; (3) deleted text begin two members to be appointed by the governor from among peace officers, at least one of whom shall be a memberdeleted text end new text begin two peace officers, one from the metropolitan area as defined in section 473.121, subdivision 2, and one from outside the metropolitan area, appointed by the governor after considering the slate of candidates submitted by the Minnesota Police and Peace Officers Association pursuant to paragraph (b);new text end new text begin (4) two peace officers who are members new text end of the Minnesota State Patrol Associationnew text begin appointed by the governor after considering the slate of candidates submitted by the Minnesota State Patrol Association pursuant to paragraph (b)new text end ; deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end the superintendent of the Minnesota Bureau of Criminal Apprehension or a designee; deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end two members appointed by the governor from among peace officers, or former peace officers, who are currently employed on a full-time basis in a professional peace officer education program; deleted text begin (6) two members to bedeleted text end new text begin (7) one membernew text end appointed by the governordeleted text begin , one member to be appointeddeleted text end from among administrators of Minnesota colleges or universities that offer professional peace officer educationdeleted text begin , anddeleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (8)new text end one member deleted text begin to be appointeddeleted text end from among the elected city officials in statutory or home rule charter cities of under 5,000 population outside the metropolitan area, as defined in section 473.121, subdivision 2new text begin , appointed by the governor after considering the slate of candidates submitted by the League of Minnesota Cities pursuant to paragraph (b)new text end ; and deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end four members appointed by the governor from among the general public. A chair deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be deleted text begin appointed by the governordeleted text end new text begin electednew text end from among the members. In making appointments the governor deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end strive to achieve representation from among the geographic areas of the state. new text begin (b) The Minnesota Sheriffs' Association, the Minnesota Chiefs of Police Association, the Minnesota Police and Peace Officers Association, the Minnesota State Patrol Association, and the League of Minnesota Cities must recommend at least two qualified representatives to the governor for each relevant appointment to the board under subdivision 1, clauses (1) to (4) and (8). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin First appointments. new text end new text begin (a) The terms of the initial governor-appointed board members must be as follows: new text end new text begin (1) terms of one member appointed under each of clauses (1), (4), (6), and (9) expire January 1, 2028; new text end new text begin (2) terms of one member appointed under each of clauses (2), (3), (7), and (9) expire January 1, 2029; new text end new text begin (3) terms of one member appointed under each of clauses (1), (4), (6), and (9) expire January 1, 2030; and new text end new text begin (4) terms of one member appointed under each of clauses (2), (3), (8), and (9) expire January 1, 2031. new text end new text begin (b) Members of the board as of January 1, 2027, other than the superintendent of the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension, are ineligible for first appointments to the board for four years from the effective date of this section. new text end new text begin (c) This subdivision expires on July 1, 2031. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end